Utah statutes.
41-3-413.   Criminal penalties -- Nonexclusive.
(1)  Knowing or intentional concealment, removal, destruction, or alteration
of a disclosure statement or of a certificate of title branded under Section
41-1a-522 is a second degree felony.
(2)  Criminal penalties under this chapter are not exclusive, but are in
addition to those under Section 76-10-1801.
(3)  The remedies provided in Sections 41-3-410 through this section are not
exclusive but are in addition to any other remedies provided by law.
